Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1272, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1272.


UNLAWFUL CARRY


A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be


unlawful for any person to carry upon or about his or her person, or


in a purse or other container belonging to the person, any pistol,


revolver, shotgun, or rifle, whether loaded or unloaded, or any


blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, metal knuckles, or any other


offensive weapon, whether such weapon be concealed or unconcealed,


except this section shall not prohibit:



Req. No. 3160 Page 1


1. The proper use of guns and knives for self-defense, hunting,


fishing, or educational or recreational purposes;


2. The carrying or use of weapons in a manner otherwise


permitted by statute or authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;


3. The carrying, possession, and use of any weapon by a peace


officer or other person authorized by law to carry a weapon in the


performance of official duties and in compliance with the rules of


the employing agency;


4. The carrying or use of weapons in a courthouse by a district


judge, associate district judge, or special district judge within


this state, who is in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and


whose name appears on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts;


5. The carrying and use of firearms and other weapons provided


in this subsection when used for the purpose of living history


reenactment. For purposes of this paragraph, “living history


reenactment” means depiction of historical characters, scenes,


historical life, or events for entertainment, education, or


historical documentation through the wearing or use of period,


historical, antique, or vintage clothing, accessories, firearms,


weapons, and other implements of the historical period; or


6. The transporting by vehicle on a public roadway or the


carrying of a firearm, concealed or unconcealed, loaded or unloaded,

Req. No. 3160 Page 2


by a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older or by a


person who is eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)


years of age and the person is a member or veteran of the United


States Armed Forces, Reserves or National Guard or was discharged


under honorable conditions from the United States Armed Forces,


Reserves or National Guard, and the person who is otherwise not


disqualified from the possession or purchase of a firearm under


state or federal law and is not carrying the firearm in furtherance


of a crime.


Except as provided in subsection B of Section 1283 of this


title, a person who has been convicted of any one of the following


offenses in this state or a violation of the equivalent law of


another state:


a. assault and battery pursuant to the provisions of


Section 644 of this title which caused serious


physical injury to the victim,


b. aggravated assault and battery pursuant to the


provisions of Section 646 of this title,


c. assault and battery that qualifies as domestic abuse


as defined in Section 644 of this title,


d. stalking pursuant to the provisions of Section 1173 of


this title,





Req. No. 3160 Page 3


e. a violation of an order issued under the Protection


from Domestic Abuse Act or a domestic abuse protection


order issued by another state, or


f. a violation relating to illegal drug use or possession


under the provisions of the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act,


shall be prohibited from carrying a firearm under the provisions of


this paragraph. Any person who carries a firearm in the manner


provided for in this paragraph shall be prohibited from carrying the


firearm into any of the places prohibited in subsection A of Section


1277 of this title or any other place currently prohibited by law.


Nothing in this section shall modify or otherwise change where a


person may legally carry a firearm.


B. Any person convicted of violating the foregoing provision


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section


1276 of this title.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.9, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1290.9.


ELIGIBILITY


The following requirements shall apply to any person making


application to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation for a


handgun license pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-


Defense Act. The person must:

Req. No. 3160 Page 4


1. Be a citizen of the United States with established residency


in the State of Oklahoma this state; or


2. Be a lawful permanent resident in the United States and have


established residency in the State of Oklahoma this state.


For purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act:


a. the term “residency” shall apply to any person who


either possesses a valid Oklahoma driver license or


state photo identification card, and physically


maintains a residence in this state or to any person,


including the spouse of such person, who has permanent


military orders within this state and possesses a


valid driver license from another state where such


person and spouse of such person claim residency, and


b. the term “lawful permanent resident” shall mean a


noncitizen who is lawfully authorized to live


permanently within the United States;


3. Be at least:


a. twenty-one (21) years of age, or


b. eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)


years of age and the person is a member or veteran of


the United States Armed Forces, the Reserves or


National Guard, or the person was discharged under


honorable conditions from the United States Armed


Forces, Reserves or National Guard;

Req. No. 3160 Page 5


4. Complete a firearms safety and training course and


demonstrate competence and qualifications qualification with the


type of pistol to be carried by the person as provided in Section


1290.14 of this title, and submit proof of training and


qualification or an exemption for training and qualification as


authorized by Section 1290.14 of this title;


5. Submit the required fee and complete the application process


as provided in Section 1290.12 of this title; and


6. Comply in good faith with the provisions of the Oklahoma


Self-Defense Act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3160 CN 1/14/2026 10:21:38 AM























Req. No. 3160 Page 6